dev/pronoun/pronoun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="অন্য__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ক/ে__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ার</l>
          <r>ে<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="int"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r>ে<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="int"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="স্বয়ং__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="য/িনি__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াকে</l>
          <r>িনি<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িনি</l>
          <r>িনি<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="য/া__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ার</l>
          <r>া<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r>া<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারা</l>
          <r>া<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>া</l>
          <r>া<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="স্বয়ং"><i>স্বয়ং</i><par n="স্বয়ং__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="যা"><i>য</i><par n="য/া__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="যিনি"><i>য</i><par n="য/িনি__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="অন্য"><i>অন্য</i><par n="অন্য__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কে"><i>ক</i><par n="ক/ে__prn"/></e>
